Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 2 Public Employee Retirement Plans Generally
24-2-618. Delegation of investment and management functions.

Trustees may delegate investment and management functions that a prudent trustee of comparable skills could properly delegate under the circumstances. The trustees shall exercise reasonable care, skill, and caution in:

Selecting an agent;

Establishing the scope and terms of the delegation, consistent with the purposes and terms of the trust; and

Reviewing periodically the agent's actions in order to monitor the agent's performance and compliance with the terms of the delegation.

In performing a delegated function, an agent owes a duty to the trust to exercise reasonable care to comply with the terms of the delegation.

Trustees who complied with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section are not liable to the beneficiaries or to the trust for the decisions or actions of the agent to whom the function was delegated.

By accepting the delegation of a trust function from the trustees of a trust that is subject to the law of this state, an agent submits to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state.

Single agent or exclusive agency delegations by the trustees shall be discouraged. Trustees shall delegate investment and management functions to a single agent or an exclusive agency arrangement only after the trustee has determined that the exclusive agency arrangement is in the best interest of the trust, has exercised extraordinary care and caution in selecting the exclusive agent, and has arranged to periodically review in detail the agent's actions to monitor the agent's performance and compliance with the terms of the delegation.

Notwithstanding the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 et seq., the boards of trustees of the respective state retirement systems shall promptly implement their investment directives consistent with the duty of care required of a fiduciary under the prudent investor rules in this chapter.

If in the capacity as fiduciary, the trustees deem it appropriate to immediately retain an investment manager or to alter the terms of an existing agreement with an investment manager, the trustees shall:

Pass a resolution stating the reason for the immediate retention of the investment manager;

State the anticipated date of implementation; and

Provide the Office of State Procurement and the staff of the Review Subcommittee of the Legislative Council the information contained in subdivisions (f)(2)(A) and (B) of this section within five (5) business days.

As required by the Review Subcommittee of the Legislative Council, a member of the board of trustees or the director of the respective retirement system fund shall appear before the next occurring meeting of that body to explain the details of the professional services contracts in question.

The length of a contract or other investment agreement and any renewal or extension of the contract or other investment agreement may be agreed upon by a state retirement system and the other party to the contract or other investment agreement and is exempt from the mandatory expiration provisions under the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 et seq., if the contract or other investment agreement is procured under the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 et seq., and the purpose of the contract or other investment agreement is to:

Invest and manage a system's trust assets under § 24-2-610;

Provide actuarial services to determine the liabilities and financial status of a state retirement plan;

Retain custody of a system's trust assets; or

Protect and recover trust assets of a system.

The board of trustees of a state retirement system shall determine the duration of the contract or other investment agreement and any renewal or extension of the contract or other investment agreement by negotiating with the other party to the contract or other investment agreement for the most favorable rates and terms for the state retirement system based on:

Market competition;

Experience of the other party to the contract or other investment agreement;

Knowledge of the state retirement system's need; and

Compliance with the prudent investor rule set forth in §§ 24-2-610 -- 24-2-619.

The board of trustees of a state retirement system shall submit information requested by the Legislative Council concerning a contract or other investment agreement procured under the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 et seq.

A partial equity ownership agreement between a state retirement system and another party shall be reviewed under § 19-11-1301 et seq.

If a contract with a consultant to provide a state retirement system consulting services, to recommend investment managers and investment funds, or for the investment of trust funds of the state retirement system under this subsection is extended, an amendment, acknowledged by the consultant in writing, shall be added to the contract extension that:

States that the State of Arkansas and the state retirement system have a statutory goal to recruit and hire emerging managers and emerging investment funds consistent with the prudent investor rule;

Requires the consultant to submit a report to the state public retirement system that describes the plan or process the consultant will use to recruit and hire emerging managers and emerging investment funds.

The consultant shall provide an emerging manager update on the progress made in the previous fiscal year to the state retirement system no later than sixty (60) days after the end of the fiscal year that details the consultant's processes in locating, analyzing, evaluating, and performing due diligence activity on emerging managers; and

Allows a state retirement system to refer or recommend a specific emerging manager or emerging investment fund to the consultant.

A state retirement system that makes a referral may request a report concerning the outcome of a referral from the consultant.

At the request of the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs or the Legislative Council, a state retirement system shall appear and make a presentation concerning the recruitment and hiring of emerging managers and emerging investment funds.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 8; 2009, No. 79, § 1; 2013, No. 304, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment added (f).

The 2013 amendment added (g).

24-2-619. Language invoking standard of subchapter.

The following terms or comparable language in the provisions of a trust, unless otherwise limited or modified, authorizes any investment or strategy permitted under this subchapter:

“Investments permissible by law for investment of trust funds”;

“Legal investments”;

“Authorized investments”;

“Using the judgment and care under the circumstances then prevailing that persons of prudence, discretion, and intelligence exercise in the management of their own affairs, not in regard to speculation but in regard to the permanent disposition of their funds, considering the probable income as well as the probable safety of their capital”;

“Prudent man rule”;

“Prudent trustee rule”;

“Prudent person rule”; and

“Prudent investor rule”.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 8.

Subchapter 7
— Arkansas Public Employee Retirement Plans

Effective Dates.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 69: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes technical corrections to a number of sections of Arkansas Code Title 24; that other legislation of this session of the General Assembly may also amend some of those sections; that this act should become effective immediately so that other legislation may be amended to reflect the technical corrections made by this act and to avoid conflicts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 340, § 2: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that economic conditions have caused the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System to suffer losses in the value of its financial assets; that the loss of asset value has created an unfunded actuarial accrued liability exceeding the standard thirty (30) year amortization period set by Arkansas law; that increasing the employer contribution rate will add to the asset values for the system and eventually return the system to financial balance; and that this act is immediately necessary because increases in the employer contribution rates can best be implemented over the summer between school years. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2005, No. 1968, § 3: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain changes are necessary to allow the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System to set employer contribution rates; that the members of the system will benefit from these changes; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 19, § 10: Apr. 11, 2006. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Supreme Court declared the public school funding system to be inadequate and that public schools are operating under a constitutional infirmity which must be corrected immediately; that to correct the constitutional infirmity and to ensure adequate funding for public education, the General Assembly must revise the public school funding formula, revise laws regarding public school facilities, provide funding for retirement increases and limit additional increases; and enact other necessary reform measures; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure that reform measures are available to public schools for the 2005-2006 and 2006-2007 school years. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 427, § 23: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act, an act that created a state agency for the purpose of providing retirement benefits to school employees of the state, are in need of revision and updating to maintain the teacher retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a fiscal year of July 1 to June 30; that a July 1, 2019 effective date is necessary to allow the provisions of this act to begin on the first day of the fiscal year and to provide for the proper administration of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; that the updates and revisions to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are of great importance for actuarial purposes and the protection of member benefits under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and that this act is necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

24-2-701. Financial objectives and actuarial valuation.

The general financial objective of each Arkansas public employee retirement plan shall be to establish and receive contributions that, expressed as percentages of active member payroll, will remain approximately level from generation to generation of state citizens. More specifically, contributions received each year shall be sufficient both:

To fully cover the costs of benefit commitments being made to members for their service being rendered in that year; and

To make a level payment that if paid annually over a reasonable period of future years will fully cover the unfunded costs of benefit commitments for service previously rendered.

Alternatively, if the costs of benefit commitments for service previously rendered are overfunded, the plan may deduct a level payment that if deducted annually over a reasonable period of future years will fully liquidate the overfunded portion of such costs.

Each state public employee retirement plan shall cause an actuarial valuation of the plan or fund to be made at least biennially, and preferably annually, to determine how well the plan is meeting the objectives set forth in subsection (a) of this section.

The employer contribution rates to the retirement systems shall be as follows:

For the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall establish employer contribution rates prospectively each year.

The employer contribution rates shall be based on the actuary's determination of the rate required to fund the plan as necessary to meet the general financial objective set forth in subsection (a) of this section.

The employer contribution rates shall be the rates determined by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System under § 24-7-401(c) and based on the annual actuarial valuation of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

For the State Police Retirement System, twenty-two percent (22%); and

For the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall establish employer contribution rates prospectively each year, and the rates shall be based on the actuary's determination of the rate required to fund the plan in accordance with the objectives set forth in subsection (a) of this section.

The employer contribution rates shall be the rates determined by the annual actuarial valuation.

Subsection (c) of this section shall not be construed as affecting in any way the existing methods of determining the years of credited service for computing benefits or determining retirement eligibility.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 8; 2003, No. 340, § 1; 2005, No. 1968, § 1; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 19, § 8; 2007, No. 403, § 1; 2019, No. 427, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

House Concurrent Resolution, No. 1003, Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), provided:

“WHEREAS, call item 13 allows for the consideration of bills concerning the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System employer contribution rate at the First Extraordinary Session of the 85th General Assembly; and WHEREAS, Arkansas Code § 10-2-115 and Rule 16(d) of the Joint Rules of the House of Representatives and the Senate provides that a bill affecting any publicly supported retirement system or systems shall not be introduced or considered at any special session of the General Assembly unless the introduction and consideration of the bill is first approved by a three-fourths (¾) vote of the full membership of each house of the General Assembly, NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED BY THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE EIGHTY-FIFTH GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS, THE SENATE CONCURRING THEREIN:

“That the House of Representatives and the Senate hereby authorize the introduction and consideration of bills providing that for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2006, and June 30, 2007, the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System employer contribution rate shall not exceed fourteen percent (14%).”

The date “June 20, 2009” in subdivision (c)(1)(D) of this section does not appear to be correct. The date should probably be “June 30, 2009”.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2008, and June 30, 2009” preceding “the Board of Trustees” in (c)(1)(A); substituted “as necessary to meet the general financial objective” for “in accordance with the objectives” in (c)(1)(B); substituted “under § 24-7-401(c) and based on the annual actuarial valuation of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System” for “based on the annual actuarial valuation” in (c)(1)(C); and deleted (c)(1)(D).

24-2-702. Reports.

Each Arkansas public employees' retirement system shall have an annual financial audit performed by Arkansas Legislative Audit and prepared in accordance with the financial accounting and reporting standards set forth for public pension plans by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board.

In addition, if approved by the board of trustees of an Arkansas public employees' retirement system, a system may also select another independent auditor to perform a separate financial audit of the respective system.

Prior to entering the contract for the additional audit, the public employees' retirement system shall provide the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee the reasons, in writing, for the need of the additional financial audit.

All contracts for audits shall be in compliance with the state's fiscal laws and rules.

A copy of each audit report prepared by another independent auditor shall be provided to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, the Legislative Council, and the Governor.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 8; 2019, No. 315, § 2847.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b)(3).

24-2-703. Tax exemptions.

The assets of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, the State Police Retirement System, the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System, the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System, and the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System are exempt from taxes by the state or any political subdivision or agency thereof.

It is the purpose of this section to provide equitable tax treatment to persons receiving benefits from alternate publicly supported retirement or annuity plans of the state's colleges and universities and the Division of Higher Education.

It is not the intent of this section to reduce the income tax exemption provided by law to any person in regard to retirement or survivor benefits.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 8; 2019, No. 910, § 2364.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” in (b)(1).

24-2-704. Retirement in event of government reorganization.

In the event of any structural reorganization of state government operations, all current employees, appointees, trustees, and commissioners of any affected agency, board, or commission shall remain associated with the state-supported retirement system that existed for them as of the date immediately prior to the reorganization.

Member employers and employees of any state-supported retirement system shall remain covered by their respective systems.

The transition of any state agency or other political subdivision of the state from one state-supported retirement system to another shall be accomplished through enabling legislation in the Eighty-fifth General Assembly.

In the event of a retirement coverage transition, there shall be no transfer of service from one retirement system to another. Instead, the provisions of §§ 24-2-402 — 24-2-405, 24-2-407, and 24-2-408 shall be in full force and effect.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 751, § 1.